HurFST/Main/HurrianOov.lexc
LEXICON Enclitic
EncliticPersonalPronoun;
SyntacticParticle;

LEXICON EncliticPersonalPronoun
LongEncliticPersonalPronoun;
ShortEncliticPersonalPronoun;

LEXICON LongEncliticPersonalPronoun
! We disallow (D) the coincidence of pronoun and verb subject agreement person and number features. 
@D.SUBJ.1SG@=1SG.ABS:@D.SUBJ.1SG@=tta	OptSyntacticParticle;
@D.SUBJ.1SG@=1SG.ABS:@D.SUBJ.1SG@=ttā	OptSyntacticParticle;
@D.SUBJ.2SG@=2SG.ABS:@D.SUBJ.2SG@=mma	OptSyntacticParticle;
@D.SUBJ.2SG@=2SG.ABS:@D.SUBJ.2SG@=mmā	OptSyntacticParticle;
@D.SUBJ.3SG@=3SG.ABS:@D.SUBJ.3SG@=nna	OptSyntacticParticle;
@D.SUBJ.3SG@=3SG.ABS:@D.SUBJ.3SG@=nnā	OptSyntacticParticle;
@D.SUBJ.3SG@=3SG.ABS:@D.SUBJ.3SG@=ma	nin;
@D.SUBJ.3SG@=3SG.ABS:@D.SUBJ.3SG@=mē	nin;
@D.SUBJ.1PL@=1PL.ABS:@D.SUBJ.1PL@=dilla	OptSyntacticParticle;
@D.SUBJ.2PL@=2PL.ABS:@D.SUBJ.2PL@=ffa	OptSyntacticParticle;
@D.SUBJ.2PL@=2PL.ABS:@D.SUBJ.2PL@=ffā	OptSyntacticParticle;
@D.SUBJ.3PL@=3PL.ABS:@D.SUBJ.3PL@=lla	OptSyntacticParticle;
@D.SUBJ.3PL@=3PL.ABS:@D.SUBJ.3PL@=llā	OptSyntacticParticle;
@D.SUBJ.3PL@=3PL.ABS:@D.SUBJ.3PL@=lle	OptSyntacticParticle;
@D.SUBJ.3PL@=3PL.ABS:@D.SUBJ.3PL@=llē	OptSyntacticParticle;

LEXICON ShortEncliticPersonalPronoun
! We disallow (D) the coincidence of pronoun and verb subject agreement person and number features.
@D.SUBJ.1SG@=1SG.ABS:@D.SUBJ.1SG@=d		OptSyntacticParticle;
@D.SUBJ.2SG@=2SG.ABS:@D.SUBJ.2SG@=m		OptSyntacticParticle;
@D.SUBJ.3SG@=3SG.ABS:@D.SUBJ.3SG@=n		OptSyntacticParticle;
@D.SUBJ.1PL@=1PL.ABS:@D.SUBJ.1PL@=dil	OptSyntacticParticle;
!@D.SUBJ.2PL@=2PL.ABS:@D.SUBJ.2PL@=v		OptSyntacticParticle;
@D.SUBJ.3PL@=3PL.ABS:@D.SUBJ.3PL@=l		OptSyntacticParticle;

LEXICON OptSyntacticParticle
#;
SyntacticParticle;

LEXICON SyntacticParticle
=CON:=an		#;
=CON:=ma		#;
=CON:=mān		#;
=EMPH:=man		#;
=PART:=mmaman	#;
nin;

LEXICON nin
=PART:=nīn		#;
